Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.382

Passenger car.

"Passenger car" means every motor vehicle except motorcycles and motor-driven cycles, designed for carrying ten passengers or less and used for the transportation of persons.

[ 1963 c 154 s 29.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1963 c 154: See note following RCW 46.37.010.